Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5903
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Insurers Examination Act:

(1) Company shall mean any person engaging in or proposing or attempting to engage in any transaction or kind of insurance or surety business and any person or group of persons who may otherwise be subject to the administrative, regulatory, or taxing authority of the director;

(2) Department shall mean the Department of Insurance;

(3) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance;

(4) Examiner shall mean any individual having been appointed by the director to conduct an examination under the act;

(5) Insurer shall mean any person authorized to transact the business of insurance, including any fraternal benefit society, reciprocal exchange, advisory organization, assessment association, unincorporated mutual association, hospital or physicians mutual insurance association, and professional association mutual insurance company; and

(6) Person shall mean any individual, aggregation of individuals, trust, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation or any affiliate thereof.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 62.